District of Columbia statutes.
9-1107.11

Amendment of laws and reorganization plans.

All laws or parts of laws of the United States and of the District of Columbia inconsistent with the provisions of Title III are hereby amended for the purpose of this subchapter to the extent necessary to eliminate such inconsistencies and to carry out the provisions of this subchapter and Title III and all laws or parts of laws and all reorganization plans of the United States are hereby amended and made applicable for the purpose of this subchapter to the extent necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter and Title III.

Nov. 6, 1966, 80 Stat. 1353, Pub. L. 89-774, § 5(a)
1973 Ed., § 1-1435.
1981 Ed., § 1-2440.